Utah statutes.
63A-12-111.   Government records ombudsman.

(1) (a)  The director of the division shall appoint a government records ombudsman.

(b)  The government records ombudsman may not be a member of the records committee.

(2)  The government records ombudsman shall:

(a)  be familiar with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(b)  serve as a resource for a person who is making or responding to a records request or filing an appeal relating to a records request;

(c)  upon request, attempt to mediate disputes between requestors and responders; and

(d)  on an annual basis, report to the Government Operations and Political Subdivisions Interim Committee on the work performed by the government records ombudsman during the previous year.

(3)  The government records ombudsman may not testify, or be compelled to testify, before the records committee, another administrative body, or a court regarding a matter that the government records ombudsman provided services in relation to under this section.

